District of Columbia statutes.
20-302

Necessity for probate.

(a)

A will is ineffective to transfer property or to nominate a personal representative unless it is admitted to probate or recorded as provided in section 20-341 (b).

(b)

Except for foreign personal representatives, no person shall exercise the powers or assume the duties of a personal representative unless he has been appointed by the Court.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-302.